Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin STUDY AND REPORT ON ACTIVITIES TO SUPPORT INNOVATIONS IN CELL AND GENE THERAPIES TO TREAT RARE DISEASES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Legislative intent. new text end new text begin The legislature finds that the development of cell and gene therapies offers significant promise to treat and potentially cure a wide range of diseases, including cancer, rare genetic disorders, and autoimmune conditions. The legislature recognizes that the state of Minnesota is a national leader in biomedical research and health care innovation and recognizes the importance of fostering scientific progress and promoting economic development in cell and gene therapy. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin State policy. new text end new text begin It is the policy of the state of Minnesota to support and encourage the advancement, commercialization, and clinical translation of new technologies and applications in the fields of cell and gene therapy. These activities include but are not limited to research and development activities, workforce training programs, public-private partnerships, regulatory science initiatives, and infrastructure to support clinical trials and biomanufacturing. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Cell and gene therapy" means a biological product intended to modify or manipulate the expression of one or more genes or to alter biological properties of living cells for therapeutic use, including but not limited to gene addition, gene editing, gene silencing, gene replacement, and cell-based therapies. new text end new text begin (c) "Rare disease" means a disease, disorder, or condition that affects fewer than 200,000 individuals in the United States and is chronic, serious, life-altering, or life-threatening. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Study on current capacity and strategies to support innovations. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of health, in consultation with the University of Minnesota, the Minnesota Rare Disease Advisory Council, and other stakeholders, shall conduct a comprehensive study on the state's current capacity for rare disease cell and gene therapy research, development, delivery, and access and on strategies to support innovations in rare disease cell and gene therapy research, development, delivery, and access. The study must include but is not limited to an assessment of: new text end new text begin (1) the infrastructure and capabilities of other states in cell and gene therapy development and delivery; new text end new text begin (2) opportunities within existing resources and statutory authority to support innovation in cell and gene therapies in the state, including alignment with state-funded research programs, participation in federal grant programs and pilot programs, and coordination with economic development programs; new text end new text begin (3) current capacity in the state for clinical trials and biomedical research on rare disease cell and gene therapies, including funding sources, academic partnerships, and industry presence; new text end new text begin (4) current capacity and future opportunities for biomanufacturing related to cell and gene therapies; new text end new text begin (5) the ability of health systems to deliver cell and gene therapies, including of facilities performing infusion therapy or transplants, hospital infrastructure, and necessary support services; new text end new text begin (6) workforce needs, including the availability of clinical geneticists, gene therapy specialists, advanced practice providers, and allied health professionals; new text end new text begin (7) policies regarding covering and paying for cell and gene therapies, including policies under the medical assistance program, policies of commercial payers, value-based payment models, and potential barriers to access resulting from these policies; new text end new text begin (8) regulatory and administrative factors, including licensing requirements, reporting requirements, and potential barriers based on existing state policies; new text end new text begin (9) health equity and access issues, including barriers to access experienced by rural and underserved communities; and new text end new text begin (10) economic impacts and costs, including short-term and long-term costs to health systems and to society. new text end new text begin (b) In conducting this study, the commissioner must seek input from patients with a rare disease, caregivers of patients with a rare disease, advocacy groups for patients with a rare disease, health care providers and clinical experts in genetics and cell and gene therapies, academic research institutions, payers, pharmacy benefit managers, the biotechnology industry, the pharmaceutical industry, and other appropriate stakeholders identified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report and recommendations. new text end new text begin By January 1, 2028, the commissioner shall submit a report to the legislature that includes: new text end new text begin (1) findings from the study conducted under subdivision 4; new text end new text begin (2) short-term and long-term recommendations for strategic investments by the state, changes to state policies, and regulatory actions by the state to support the state in leading on rare disease cell and gene therapies; and new text end new text begin (3) identification of potential federal funding opportunities, public-private partnerships, and grant programs to support implementation of the recommendations. new text end new text begin The report must also be posted on the Department of Health website. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for a study and report on activities to support innovations in rare disease cell and gene therapies. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end